Hawaii statutes.
§467B-11.5 Charitable organizations
exempted from registration and financial disclosure requirements. The
following charitable organizations shall not be subject to sections 467B-2.1
and 467B-6.5, if the organization submits an application for an exemption to
the department and the department approves the organization's application:

(1) Any duly organized religious corporation,
institution, or society that is exempt from filing Form 990 with the Internal
Revenue Service pursuant to sections 6033(a)(3)(A)(i) and (iii) and
6033(a)(3)(C)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended;

(2) Parent-teacher associations;

(3) Any educational institution that is licensed or
accredited by any of the following licensing or accrediting organizations:

(A) Hawaii Association of Independent
Schools;

(B) Hawaii Council of Private Schools;

(C) Western Association of Schools and
Colleges;

(D) Middle States Association of Colleges and
Schools;

(E) New England Association of Schools and
Colleges;

(F) North Central Association of Colleges and
Schools;

(G) Northwest Commission on Colleges and
Universities;

(H) Southern Association of Colleges and
Schools;

(I) The National Association for the
Education of Young Children; or

(J) The Northwest Accreditation Commission
for Primary and Secondary Schools;

and any organization exempt from taxation
under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code expressly authorized by,
and having an established identity with an educational institution accredited
by one of the foregoing accrediting agencies; provided that the organization's
solicitation of contributions is primarily directed to the students, alumni,
faculty, and trustees of the institutions and their respective families;

(4) Any nonprofit hospital licensed by the State or
any similar provision of the laws of any other state;

(5) Any corporation established by an act of the
United States Congress that is required by federal law to submit to Congress
annual reports, fully audited by the United States Department of Defense, of
its activities including itemized accounts of all receipts and expenditures;

(6) Any agency of this State, another state, or the
federal government; and

(7) Any charitable organization that normally
receives less than $25,000 in contributions annually, if the organization does
not employ or compensate a professional solicitor or professional fundraising
counsel. For purposes of this paragraph, an organization normally receives
less than $25,000 in contributions annually if, during the immediately
preceding three fiscal years, it received, on average, less than $25,000 in
contributions.

The attorney general may require the application for
exemption to be filed electronically with the department and may require the
use of electronic signatures. [L 2008, c 174, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 40, §5; am
L 2013, c 61, §11; am L 2016, c 163, §7]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next